Maryland, session 2026, SB0575.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 10–601(p) through (hhh) of Article – Economic Development of the
Annotated Code of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 10–601(s) through (kkk),
respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Economic Development
10–601.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Authority” means the Maryland Stadium Authority.

SENATE BILL 575 3
(P) (1) “CHARLES COUNTY SPORTS AND WELLNESS CENTER” MEANS
THE EVENTS FACILITY LOCATED IN CHARLES COUNTY, MARYLAND, USED FOR
COMMUNITY EVENTS, RECREATIONAL EVENTS, AND OTHER RELATED ACTIVITIES.
(2) “CHARLES COUNTY SPORTS AND WELLNESS CENTER”
INCLUDES:
(I) FIELDS AND AMPHITHEATERS;
(II) OFFICES;
(III) PARKING LOTS AND GARAGES;
(IV) ACCESS ROADS;
(V) FOOD SERVICE FACILITIES; AND
(VI) OTHER FUNCTIONALLY RELATED STRUCTURES AND
IMPROVEMENTS.
(Q) “CHARLES COUNTY SPORTS AND WELLNESS CENTER FUND” MEANS
THE CHARLES COUNTY SPORTS AND WELLNESS CENTER FUND ESTABLISHED
UNDER § 10–657.7 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(R) “CHARLES COUNTY SPORTS AND WELLNESS CENTER SITE” MEANS THE
SITE OF THE CHARLES COUNTY SPORTS AND WELLNESS CENTER IN CHARLES
COUNTY, MARYLAND.
(v) “Facility” means:
(1) a structure or other improvement developed at Camden Yards;
(2) a convention facility;
(3) the Hippodrome Performing Arts facility;
(4) a sports facility;
(5) a Baltimore City public school facility;
(6) a racing facility;
(7) a training facility for thoroughbred horses;

SENATE BILL 575
(8) a public school facility;
(9) the Hagerstown Multi–Use Sports and Events Facility;
(10) a sports entertainment facility; [or]
(11) a Prince George’s County Blue Line Corridor facility; OR
(12) THE CHARLES COUNTY SPORTS AND WELLNESS CENTER.
10–613.
(a) The Authority may:
(14) with respect to site acquisition, construction, and development of the
Hippodrome Performing Arts facility [and], the Hagerstown Multi–Use Sports and Events
Facility, AND THE CHARLES COUNTY SPORTS AND WELLNESS CENTER, establish and
participate in Authority affiliates;
(b) The Authority may review and make recommendations on proposed
convention center facilities, the Hippodrome Performing Arts facility, the Hagerstown
Multi–Use Sports and Events Facility, [and] a Prince George’s County Blue Line Corridor
facility, AND THE CHARLES COUNTY SPORTS AND WELLNESS CENTER, including the
expansion and enhancement of the Baltimore City Convention Center and the Ocean City
Convention Center and the development and construction of the Montgomery County
Conference Center, the Hippodrome Performing Arts Center, the Hagerstown
Multi–Use Sports and Events Facility, [and] a Prince George’s County Blue Line Corridor
facility, AND THE CHARLES COUNTY SPORTS AND WELLNESS CENTER, with respect
to location, purpose, design, function, capacity, parking, costs, funding mechanisms, and
revenue alternatives, with specific recommendations on:
(1) the level of support from the private sector;
(2) the type of support from the private sector;
(3) special taxing sources;
(4) projected revenues;
(5) bonding authority and the source of debt service; and
(6) the fiscal impact on the State of any revenue alternatives.
10–618.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, contracts to

SENATE BILL 575 5
acquire any facility site, to construct the facility, or for construction on the facility site
require the prior approval of the Board of Public Works.
(2) Contracts to construct a public school facility or for construction on a
public school site do not require the prior approval of the Board of Public Works.
(b) The Authority may:
(1) acquire by any of the means specified in § 10–620(a) of this subtitle:
(i) a site at Camden Yards for a facility;
(ii) a Baltimore Convention site or an interest in the site;
(iii) an Ocean City Convention site or an interest in the site;
(iv) a Montgomery County Conference site or an interest in the site;
(v) a Hippodrome Performing Arts site or an interest in the site;
(vi) a Hagerstown Multi–Use Sports and Events Facility site or an
interest in the site;
(vii) a sports entertainment facility site or an interest in the site;
[and]
(viii) a Prince George’s County Blue Line Corridor facility site or an
interest in the site; and
(IX) A CHARLES COUNTY SPORTS AND WELLNESS CENTER SITE
OR AN INTEREST IN THE SITE; AND
(2) construct or enter into a contract to construct a facility on a site it
acquires under this subsection.
10–620.
(a) (1) Subject to annual appropriations and this subtitle, the Authority may
acquire in its own name, by gift, purchase, or condemnation, any property or interest in
property necessary or convenient to construct, improve, or operate a facility.
(d) (1) The exercise of authority under this subsection is subject to the prior
approval of the Board of Public Works.
(2) On request of the Authority, the State, a unit of the State, or a political
subdivision may lease, lend, grant, or otherwise convey to the Authority, property,
including property devoted to public use, as necessary or convenient for the purposes of this

SENATE BILL 575
subtitle.
(3) The State may lease or sublease a facility, or an interest in a facility,
from or to the Authority, whether or not constructed or usable.
(4) Lease payments to the Authority appropriated by the State shall be
transferred to:
(i) the Baltimore Convention Fund if appropriated for a Baltimore
Convention facility;
(ii) the Camden Yards Fund if appropriated for a sports facility or
other facility at Camden Yards;
(iii) the Hippodrome Performing Arts Fund if appropriated for a
Hippodrome Performing Arts facility;
(iv) the Montgomery County Conference Fund if appropriated for a
Montgomery County Conference facility;
(v) the Ocean City Convention Fund if appropriated for an Ocean
City Convention facility;
(vi) the Hagerstown Multi–Use Sports and Events Facility Fund if
appropriated for a Hagerstown Multi–Use Sports and Events Facility;
(vii) the Sports Entertainment Facilities Financing Fund if
appropriated for a sports entertainment facility; [or]
(viii) the Prince George’s County Blue Line Corridor Facility Fund if
appropriated for a Prince George’s County Blue Line Corridor facility; OR
(IX) THE CHARLES COUNTY SPORTS AND WELLNESS CENTER
FUND IF APPROPRIATED FOR THE CHARLES COUNTY SPORTS AND WELLNESS
CENTER.
(e) (1) This subsection does not apply to the Camden Yards site, Baltimore
Convention site, Ocean City Convention site, Hippodrome Performing Arts site, any
Baltimore City public school site, any racing facility, the Hagerstown Multi–Use Sports and
Events Facility site, any supplemental facility site, any public school site, a sports
entertainment facility, [or] a Prince George’s County Blue Line Corridor facility site, OR
THE CHARLES COUNTY SPORTS AND WELLNESS CENTER SITE.
(2) The Authority and any Authority affiliate are subject to applicable
planning, zoning, and development regulations to the same extent as a private commercial
or industrial enterprise.

SENATE BILL 575 7
10–625.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the Authority shall submit:
(1) an annual detailed report of the activities and financial status of the
Authority to the Governor, and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, the General Assembly; and
(2) annual reports on the additional tax revenues generated by each of the
following facilities:
(i) the Baltimore Convention facility;
(ii) the Hippodrome Performing Arts facility;
(iii) the Montgomery County Conference facility;
(iv) the Ocean City Convention facility;
(v) the Hagerstown Multi–Use Sports and Events Facility;
(vi) a sports entertainment facility; [and]
(vii) a Prince George’s County Blue Line Corridor facility site; AND
(VIII) THE CHARLES COUNTY SPORTS AND WELLNESS CENTER.
10–628.
(a) Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section and subject to the
prior approval of the Board of Public Works, the Authority may issue bonds at any time for
any corporate purpose of the Authority, including the establishment of reserves and the
payment of interest.
(c) (1) Unless authorized by the General Assembly, the Board of Public Works
may not approve an issuance by the Authority of bonds, whether taxable or tax exempt,
that constitute tax supported debt or nontax supported debt if, after issuance, there would
be outstanding and unpaid more than the following face amounts of the bonds for the
purpose of financing acquisition, construction, renovation, and related expenses for
construction management, professional fees, and contingencies in connection with:
(i) the Baltimore Convention facility – $55,000,000;
(ii) the Hippodrome Performing Arts facility – $20,250,000;
(iii) the Montgomery County Conference facility – $23,185,000;

SENATE BILL 575
(iv) the Ocean City Convention facility – $24,500,000;
(v) Baltimore City public school facilities – $1,100,000,000;
(vi) supplemental facilities – $25,000,000;
(vii) racing facilities – $405,000,000;
(viii) public school facilities in the State – $2,200,000,000;
(ix) the Hagerstown Multi–Use Sports and Events
Facility – $59,500,000;
(x) sports entertainment facilities – $220,000,000; [and]
(xi) Prince George’s County Blue Line Corridor
facilities – $400,000,000; AND
(XII) CHARLES COUNTY SPORTS AND WELLNESS CENTER
FACILITIES – $45,000,000.
(2) (i) The limitation under paragraph (1)(i) of this subsection applies
to the aggregate principal amount of bonds outstanding as of June 30 of any year.
(ii) Refunded bonds may not be included in the determination of an
outstanding aggregate amount under this paragraph.
10–646.5.
(A) EXCEPT AS AUTHORIZED BY § 10–639 OF THIS SUBTITLE, TO FINANCE
SITE ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION OF ANY SEGMENT OF THE
CHARLES COUNTY SPORTS AND WELLNESS CENTER, THE AUTHORITY SHALL
COMPLY WITH THIS SECTION.
(B) AT LEAST 45 DAYS BEFORE SEEKING APPROVAL OF THE BOARD OF
PUBLIC WORKS FOR EACH BOND ISSUE OR OTHER BORROWING, THE AUTHORITY
SHALL PROVIDE TO THE FISCAL COMMITTEES OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, A
COMPREHENSIVE FINANCING PLAN FOR THE RELEVANT SEGMENT OF THE FACILITY.
(C) THE AUTHORITY SHALL OBTAIN THE APPROVAL OF THE BOARD OF
PUBLIC WORKS OF THE PROPOSED BOND ISSUE AND THE FINANCING PLAN.
(D) THE AUTHORITY MAY NOT ISSUE BONDS TO FINANCE THE CHARLES

SENATE BILL 575 9
COUNTY SPORTS AND WELLNESS CENTER UNTIL THE AUTHORITY AND CHARLES
COUNTY SECURE A WRITTEN OPERATING AGREEMENT.
(E) THE AUTHORITY SHALL SECURE A WRITTEN AGREEMENT TO TRANSFER
OWNERSHIP OF THE CHARLES COUNTY SPORTS AND WELLNESS CENTER FROM THE
AUTHORITY TO CHARLES COUNTY, AS APPROVED BY THE BOARD OF PUBLIC
WORKS:
(1) IN WHICH CHARLES COUNTY AGREES TO:
(I) OWN, MARKET, PROMOTE, AND OPERATE OR CONTRACT FOR
THE MARKETING, PROMOTION, AND OPERATION OF THE CHARLES COUNTY SPORTS
AND WELLNESS CENTER IN A MANNER THAT MAXIMIZES THE CHARLES COUNTY
SPORTS AND WELLNESS CENTER’S ECONOMIC RETURN;
(II) MAINTAIN AND REPAIR OR CONTRACT FOR THE
MAINTENANCE AND REPAIR OF THE CHARLES COUNTY SPORTS AND WELLNESS
CENTER SO AS TO KEEP THE CHARLES COUNTY SPORTS AND WELLNESS CENTER IN
FIRST–CLASS OPERATING CONDITION; AND
(III) BE SOLELY RESPONSIBLE FOR ALL EXPENDITURES
RELATING TO THE OPERATION, MAINTENANCE, AND REPAIR OF THE CHARLES
COUNTY SPORTS AND WELLNESS CENTER THAT MAY BE INCURRED, INCLUDING
THE AMOUNT BY WHICH EXPENDITURES EXCEED REVENUES; AND
(2) THAT:
(I) PROTECTS THE INVESTMENTS OF THE AUTHORITY AND
CHARLES COUNTY IN THE CHARLES COUNTY SPORTS AND WELLNESS CENTER;
(II) REQUIRES CHARLES COUNTY TO CONTRIBUTE TO A
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT RESERVE FUND AN AMOUNT SUFFICIENT TO KEEP THE
CHARLES COUNTY SPORTS AND WELLNESS CENTER IN FIRST–CLASS OPERATING
CONDITION;
(III) REQUIRES CHARLES COUNTY TO BE SOLELY RESPONSIBLE
FOR ALL EXPENDITURES RELATING TO THE OPERATION OF THE CHARLES COUNTY
SPORTS AND WELLNESS CENTER THAT MAY BE INCURRED, INCLUDING OPERATING
DEFICITS; AND
(IV) ALLOWS CHARLES COUNTY TO KEEP ALL OPERATING
PROFITS RESULTING FROM THE OPERATION OF THE CHARLES COUNTY SPORTS AND
WELLNESS CENTER EACH YEAR.

SENATE BILL 575
(F) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31 EACH YEAR, CHARLES COUNTY SHALL
REPORT TO THE SENATE BUDGET AND TAXATION COMMITTEE AND THE HOUSE
APPROPRIATIONS COMMITTEE, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON CHARLES COUNTY’S ASSESSMENT OF THE
MAINTENANCE AND REPAIR NEEDED TO KEEP THE CHARLES COUNTY SPORTS AND
WELLNESS CENTER IN OPERATING ORDER.
10–657.7.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FUND” MEANS THE CHARLES COUNTY SPORTS AND
WELLNESS CENTER FUND.
(B) THERE IS A CHARLES COUNTY SPORTS AND WELLNESS CENTER FUND.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO ENABLE THE AUTHORITY TO:
(1) USE THE FUND AS A REVOLVING FUND FOR IMPLEMENTING THIS
SUBTITLE AS IT RELATES TO THE CHARLES COUNTY SPORTS AND WELLNESS
CENTER; AND
(2) PAY ANY EXPENSES INCURRED BY THE AUTHORITY THAT ARE
RELATED TO THE CHARLES COUNTY SPORTS AND WELLNESS CENTER.
(D) THE AUTHORITY SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(E) (1) THE FUND IS A CONTINUING, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO REVERSION UNDER § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(F) (1) TO THE EXTENT CONSIDERED APPROPRIATE BY THE AUTHORITY,
THE RECEIPTS OF THE FUND SHALL BE PLEDGED TO AND CHARGED WITH THE
FOLLOWING RELATING TO THE CHARLES COUNTY SPORTS AND WELLNESS
CENTER:
(I) PAYMENT OF DEBT SERVICE ON AUTHORITY BONDS;
(II) ALL REASONABLE CHARGES AND EXPENSES RELATED TO
THE AUTHORITY’S BORROWING; AND

SENATE BILL 575 11
(III) THE MANAGEMENT OF AUTHORITY OBLIGATIONS.
(2) THE PLEDGE SHALL BE EFFECTIVE AS PROVIDED IN § 10–634 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(G) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) MONEY APPROPRIATED FOR DEPOSIT IN THE FUND;
(2) REVENUES COLLECTED OR RECEIVED FROM ANY SOURCE UNDER
THIS SUBTITLE CONCERNING THE CHARLES COUNTY SPORTS AND WELLNESS
CENTER; AND
(3) ANY ADDITIONAL MONEY MADE AVAILABLE FROM ANY PUBLIC OR
PRIVATE SOURCE FOR THE PURPOSES ESTABLISHED FOR THE FUND.
(H) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE PAID INTO THE
FUND.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(iii) The provisions of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph do not
apply to the following funds:
212. the Department of Social and Economic Mobility Special
Fund; [and]
213. the Population Health Improvement Fund; AND
214. THE CHARLES COUNTY SPORTS AND WELLNESS
CENTER FUND.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect

SENATE BILL 575
October 1, 2026.